District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.11

Meetings.

(a)

A board of directors shall meet at least annually and may hold meetings inside or outside the District.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a board of directors may permit directors to attend or conduct board meetings through the use of any means of communication if all directors attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 811 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition